North Carolina, session 2025, HB61.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-34.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-34.5. Assault with a firearm on a law enforcement, probation, or parole officer, or
on a member of the North Carolina National Guard, or on a person employed at
a State or local detention facility.
(a) Any person who commits an assault with a firearm upon a law enforcement officer,
probation officer, or parole officer while the officer is in the performance of his or her duties is
guilty of a Class D felony.
(a1) Any person who commits an assault with a firearm upon a member of the North
Carolina National Guard while the member is in the performance of his or her duties is guilty of
a Class D felony.
(b) Anyone who commits an assault with a firearm upon a person who is employed at a
detention facility operated under the jurisdiction of the State or a local government while the
employee is in the performance of the employee's duties is guilty of a Class D felony.any of the
following persons who are in the performance of their duties is guilty of a Class B1 felony:
(1) A law enforcement officer.
(2) A probation officer.
(3) A parole officer.
(4) A member of the North Carolina National Guard.
(5) An employee of a detention facility operated under the jurisdiction of the State
or a local government.
(6) An emergency medical technician or other emergency health care provider.
(7) A medical responder.
(8) A firefighter.
(9) A telecommunicator employed by a law enforcement agency."
SECTION 2. G.S. 14-34.6(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Unless a person's conduct is covered under some other provision of law providing
greater punishment, a person is guilty of a Class D felony if the person violates subsection (a) of
this section against a person not otherwise covered under G.S. 14-34.5 and uses a firearm."
*H61-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 61-First Edition